Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Solemn Form

53-5-20.
Conclusiveness.

Probate in solemn form is conclusive upon all persons served with notice, including persons waiving service of notice or served with notice through a guardian ad litem or other appropriate representative, and upon all beneficiaries under the will who are represented by the personal representative.

As to heirs and other persons required to be served with notice by Code Section 53-5-22 who are not effectively served with notice in a manner adequate to satisfy subsection (a) of this Code section, a proceeding to probate in solemn form shall otherwise be as conclusive as if probate had been in common form.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, a proceeding to probate in solemn form is conclusive against all persons, regardless of service or notice, six months from the date the order admitting such will to probate in solemn form is entered by the court in such proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-21/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the first sentence of the previously existing provisions as subsection (a) and, in subsection (a), substituted “persons served with notice, including persons waiving service of notice or served with notice through a guardian ad litem or other appropriate representative,” for “parties notified” and substituted “personal representative” for “executor”; designated the second sentence of the previously existing provisions as subsection (b) and, in subsection (b), inserted “and other persons required to be served with notice by Code Section 53-5-22 who are” and substituted “served with notice in a manner adequate to satisfy subsection (a) of this Code section” for “notified”; and added subsection (c).

Cross references.

Subscribing witness’s testimony, §

24-9-903

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Byrd v. Riggs,

209 Ga. 930

,

76 S.E.2d 774

(1953), see
16 Ga. B.J. 338 (1954);
18 Ga. B.J. 211 (1955).

For comment on the constitutionality of Ga. L. 1958, pp. 657, 658; as amended by Ga. L. Ex. Sess., 1964, pp. 16, 17, reducing the number of required witnesses to a will to two, in light of the constitutional provision that no law shall refer to more than one subject matter, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 126 (1964).

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 327 (2019).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-5-21.
Procedure.

A will may be proved in solemn form after service of notice upon the persons required to be served, upon the testimony of all the witnesses in life and within the jurisdiction of the court, or by proof of their signatures and that of the testator as provided in Code Section 53-5-23; provided, however, that the testimony of only one witness shall be required to prove the will in solemn form if no caveat is filed. If a will is self-proved, compliance with signature requirements and other requirements of execution is presumed subject to rebuttal without the necessity of the testimony of any witness upon filing the will and affidavit annexed or attached thereto.

The petition to probate a will in solemn form shall set forth the full name, the place of domicile, and the date of death of the testator; the mailing address of the petitioner; the names, ages or majority status, and addresses of all the heirs, stating each such heir’s relationship to the testator; and whether, to the knowledge of the petitioner, any other proceedings with respect to the probate of another purported will of the testator are pending in this state and, if so, the names and addresses of the propounders and the names, addresses, and ages or majority status of the beneficiaries under the other purported will. If a testamentary guardian is being appointed in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 29-2-4, the names and mailing addresses of any persons required to be served with notice pursuant to such Code section shall be provided by the petitioner. In the event full particulars are lacking, the petition shall state the reasons for any omission. The petition shall conclude with a prayer for issuance of letters testamentary. If all of the heirs acknowledge service of the petition and notice and shall in their acknowledgment assent thereto, and if there are no other proceedings pending in this state with respect to the probate of another purported will of the decedent, the will may be probated and letters testamentary thereupon may issue without further delay; provided, however, that letters of guardianship shall only be issued in accordance with Code Section 29-2-4.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2014, p. 780, § 4-2/SB 364; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-22/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “service of notice upon the persons required to be served” for “due notice” and substituted “Code Section 53-5-23; provided, however, that the testimony” for “Code Section 53-5-23. The testimony”; and substituted “all the heirs, stating each such heir’s relationship” for “the surviving spouse and of all the other heirs, stating their relationship” in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Subscribing witness’s testimony, §

24-9-903

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Byrd v. Riggs,

209 Ga. 930

,

76 S.E.2d 774

(1953), see
16 Ga. B.J. 338 (1954);
18 Ga. B.J. 211 (1955).

For comment on the constitutionality of Ga. L. 1958, pp. 657, 658; as amended by Ga. L. Ex. Sess., 1964, pp. 16, 17, reducing the number of required witnesses to a will to two, in light of the constitutional provision that no law shall refer to more than one subject matter, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 126 (1964).

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

53-5-22.
Service of notice.

Probate in solemn form requires service of notice on all the heirs of the testator and, if there is any other purported will of the testator for which probate proceedings are pending in this state, on all the beneficiaries under and propounders of such purported will. Service of notice of a petition for probate in solemn form shall be by personal service if the party resides in this state and is known and shall be served at least 30 days before probate is to be made, except that, if such service of notice is waived, the 30 day provision shall not apply.

For purposes of serving notice on beneficiaries under a purported will for which probate proceedings are pending in this state, notice shall be served on:

Each beneficiary:

Who has a present interest, including but not limited to a vested remainder interest but not including trust beneficiaries where there is a trustee; and

Whose identity and whereabouts are known or may be determined by reasonable diligence;

The duly acting conservator or guardian of each individual beneficiary with a present interest or power, other than a mere trust beneficiary, who is not sui juris; and

Each trustee.

Service of notice shall not be required in the case of a person whose interest, even though vested, cannot be possessed until the passage of time or the happening of a contingency. The probate court may, on the motion of any party in interest or on its own motion, modify the service of notice required in the case of numerous beneficiaries of the same or similar class where the value of each testamentary gift is, or appears to be, nominal. Upon the motion of any party in interest or upon its own motion, the court may determine whether the interest of any beneficiary required to be served with notice under this subsection is adequately represented, including any contingent interest of a beneficiary, and if such representation is found to be inadequate, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent each beneficiary or order such other service of notice as may be appropriate to a beneficiary of a contingent interest. If a trustee named in the will indicates a refusal to represent the beneficiaries of the testamentary trust, the court may order that notice be served directly on the beneficiaries of the trust. The provisions of Code Section 53-12-8 shall be applicable to a trust beneficiary required to be served with notice or represented under this subsection.

Service of a notice of petition for probate in solemn form shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 11 of this title and, if made personally or by mail, shall include a copy of the petition and of the will for which probate is sought. If service is to be made by publication, the published notice shall set forth the court, the time the order for service by publication was granted, the name of the decedent, the fact that a petition has been filed seeking the probate of the will of the decedent in solemn form, and the name of the petitioner who seeks letters testamentary or the continuance in force of any letters testamentary previously granted. The notice shall command all parties to whom it is directed to file objection, if there is any.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 17; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-23/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “service of notice on” for “due notice to”, deleted a comma following “heirs of the testator”, and substituted “on all the beneficiaries under” for “then such notice shall also be given to the beneficiaries”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “shall be by personal service” for “shall be personal”, substituted “30 days” for “ten days”, and substituted “if such service of notice is waived, the 30 day provision” for “if waived, the
ten-day provision”; and, in subsection (b), in the introductory language, substituted “serving notice on” for “giving notice to” and “served on” for “given to”, inserted “conservator or”’ in paragraph (b)(2), and, in the undesignated language at the end of subsection (b), substituted “Service of notice” for “Notice” in the first sentence, in the second and third sentences, inserted “the motion of any party in interest or on its own” preceding “motion” and “service of” preceding “notice”, substituted “served with notice” for “notified” in the third sentence, substituted “served directly on” for “given directly to” in the fourth sentence, and added the last sentence.

Cross references.

Subscribing witness’s testimony, §

24-9-903

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Byrd v. Riggs,

209 Ga. 930

,

76 S.E.2d 774

(1953), see
16 Ga. B.J. 338 (1954);
18 Ga. B.J. 211 (1955).

For comment on the constitutionality of Ga. L. 1958, pp. 657, 658; as amended by Ga. L. Ex. Sess., 1964, pp. 16, 17, reducing the number of required witnesses to a will to two, in light of the constitutional provision that no law shall refer to more than one subject matter, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 126 (1964).

For article discussing methods of summary distribution and settlement of decedent’s estate, see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).